Utah statutes.
11-45-203.   Applications.

(1)  A political subdivision shall submit an application to the board in the form and containing the information that the board requires, which shall include the plans and specifications for the proposed energy efficiency project.

(2) (a)  In the application, a political subdivision may request a loan to cover all or part of the cost of an energy efficiency project.

(b)  If an application is rejected, the board shall notify the applicant stating the reasons for the rejection.

